Utah statutes.
53-7-407.   Implementation -- Effect of part on Model Tobacco Settlement Act and Tobacco Tax and Licensing Act.

(1)  The state fire marshal may promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part.

(2)  The State Tax Commission in the regular course of conducting inspections of wholesale dealers, agents, and retail dealers, as authorized under Title 59, Chapter 14, Cigarette and Tobacco Tax and Licensing Act, may inspect cigarettes to determine if the cigarettes are marked as required by Section 53-7-405.  If the cigarettes are not marked as required, the State Tax Commission shall notify the state fire marshal.

(3)  Nothing in this part shall affect an entity's obligations pursuant to:

(a)  Title 59, Chapter 14, Cigarette and Tobacco Tax and Licensing Act; or

(b)  Title 59, Chapter 22, Model Tobacco Settlement Act.

